Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Article 3. Reorganization Transition.

§ 7-17-31.
Repealed.

Repealed from and after June 30, 1990, by terms of Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 7(7).

§7-17-31. [En Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 7]

§ 7-17-33.
Transfer of powers, authority, duties, functions and funds; use of stationery and supplies of predecessor agency or department.

All power, authority, duties and functions of the boards, commissions, departments and agencies abolished by “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989 [Chapter 544, Laws of 1989]” shall, from and after July 1, 1989, vest in and be performed by the departments or agencies to which they are assigned. All records, personnel, property and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocation or other funds of the abolished departments or agencies, except those transferred elsewhere by other provisions of “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989”, shall be transferred under the direction of the State Fiscal Officer to the proper department or agency on July 1, 1989. The transfer of segregated or special funds shall be made in such a manner that the relation between program and revenue source as provided by law is retained.

The newly created Department of Economic and Community Development and the newly created Department of Environmental Quality shall continue to use the stationery or other supplies having thereon the letterhead of their predecessor agency or department until such stationery or other supplies are depleted. Such newly created departments shall not expend any funds to purchase stationery or other supplies having thereon the letterhead of the newly created department until such time as the supplies of their predecessor agency or department are depleted as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1989).

§ 7-17-35.
Agencies to assist in transition; rules and regulations; legislative intent concerning personnel reductions.

Each officer, department or agency subject to the provisions of “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989 [Chapter 544, Laws of 1989]” shall assist with the fullest degree of reasonable cooperation with any other officer, department or agency in carrying out the intent and purpose of “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989”.

Each officer, department or agency subject to the provisions of “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989” is hereby authorized and empowered to promulgate all necessary rules and regulations not in conflict with “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989” necessary to accomplish an orderly transition pursuant to “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989”.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the number of persons employed by the various departments and agencies as a result of the consolidation required by “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989” shall be reduced, but it is the intent of the Legislature that wherever possible, such reduction shall result from attrition of employees, assistance in relocating to other positions in state government for which they are qualified, and by assistance in locating employment in the private sector.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1989).

§ 7-17-37.
Procedures for eliminating and filling personnel positions; benefit rights of terminated employees.

Upon the decision by a department executive director to eliminate a personnel position, the executive director shall notify the State Personnel Board and the affected employee of the intention to eliminate the position. No employee shall be required to vacate an eliminated position prior to sixty (60) days from the date notice is sent to that employee.

Executive directors hiring personnel to fill existing vacant positions shall first interview persons placed on the reduction in force list maintained by the State Personnel Board to fill positions for which they are qualified. If the executive director does not hire a person on the reduction in force list for a position for which he interviewed and is qualified, the executive director shall provide justification upon request by the interviewed person or the State Personnel Board.

If an employee whose position is terminated by virtue of the executive branch reorganization brought about by “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989 [Laws, 1989, Chapter 544]” is rehired by the State of Mississippi within three (3) years from the date of his termination, the employee shall have the same benefit date for leave accumulation purposes as he had when his position was terminated. Any accumulated leave benefits not given to the employee at the time his position was eliminated shall be restored to him upon his rehiring.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1989).